Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-973
Prison Overcrowding Contingency Fund; created; use; investment; study of inmate classification.

The Prison Overcrowding Contingency Fund is created. The State Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million dollars from the General Fund to the Prison Overcrowding Contingency Fund on or before July 15, 2021, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services. It is the intent of the Legislature that these funds remain in the Prison Overcrowding Contingency Fund until sufficient details are provided to the Legislature regarding plans to reduce prison overcrowding, except that (1) the fund may be used for purposes of a study of inmate classification within the Department of Correctional Services and (2) transfers may be made to the General Fund or the Vocational and Life Skills Programming Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Prison Overcrowding Contingency Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2021, LB384, § 28;

Laws 2022, LB1012, § 29;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 204.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.